Arkansas, session 2025, SB67.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
established for the Arkansas Public Defender Commission - State Operations
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U082U PUBLIC DEF COMM EXEC DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE03
(2) G317C APDC MANAGEMENT ASSOCIATE 1 GRADE SE01
(3) G334C CHIEF PUBLIC DEFENDER II 9 GRADE GS15
(4) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(5) X222C APDC CHIEF CAPITAL INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS10
*JAR033*
04-14-2025 11:42:38 JAR033

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 S4/14/25 SB67
(6) G336C MITIGATION SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS08
(7) G335C PD INVESTIGATOR SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS08
(8) G337C PD LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS08
(9) X056C CAPITAL CONFLICTS INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(10) G122C PUBLIC DEFENDER PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(11) C012C PUBLIC DEFENDER SUPT SVCS SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(12) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 22

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized,
for the Arkansas Public Defender Commission - State Operations for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: three (3) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Defender Commission, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Arkansas Public Defender Commission - State Operations for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,108,619
(02) EXTRA HELP 12,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 660,900
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 247,648
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 19,690
(C) PROF. FEES 925,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,973,857
04-14-2025 11:42:38 JAR033

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 S4/14/25 SB67

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - TRIAL PUBLIC DEFENDER OFFICE. There is
hereby established for the Arkansas Public Defender Commission - Trial Public
Defender Office for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G061N SENIOR PUBLIC DEFENDER 8 GRADE SE01
(2) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(3) D039C NETWORK SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(4) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE IT02
(5) D089C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ASSISTANT 1 GRADE IT01
(6) G334C CHIEF PUBLIC DEFENDER II 35 GRADE GS15
(7) G008N CHIEF PUBLIC DEFENDER 1 GRADE GS14
(8) G012N PUBLIC DEFENDER III 182 GRADE GS13
(9) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(10) G338C DRUG COURT CASE COORDINATOR II 1 GRADE GS08
(11) G336C MITIGATION SPECIALIST II 11 GRADE GS08
(12) G335C PD INVESTIGATOR SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS08
(13) G337C PD LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS08
(14) G194C PUBLIC DEFENDER INTERPRETER II 2 GRADE GS08
(15) G092C PUBLIC DEFENDER PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(16) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(17) X056C CAPITAL CONFLICTS INVESTIGATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(18) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS06
(19) X063C PUBLIC DEFENDER INVESTIGATOR 3 GRADE GS06
(20) G122C PUBLIC DEFENDER PROGRAM COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(21) C012C PUBLIC DEFENDER SUPT SVCS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(22) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 47 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 316

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP - TRIAL PUBLIC DEFENDER OFFICE. There is hereby
authorized, for the Arkansas Public Defender Commission - Trial Public
04-14-2025 11:42:38 JAR033

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 S4/14/25 SB67
Defender Office for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable
from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: three (3) temporary or
part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - TRIAL PUBLIC DEFENDER OFFICE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Defender Commission, to be
payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Arkansas Public Defender Commission - Trial Public
Defender Office for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $24,735,305
(02) EXTRA HELP 15,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 8,358,242
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 659,256
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 34,000
(C) PROF. FEES 725,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) PUBLIC DEFENDER COMMISSION PROGRAMS 770,000
(06) BAIL BOND COUNTY PUBLIC DEFENDER 300,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $35,596,803

SECTION 7. REGULAR SALARIES - OMBUDSMAN PROGRAM. There is hereby
established for the Arkansas Public Defender Commission - Ombudsman Program
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
04-14-2025 11:42:38 JAR033

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 S4/14/25 SB67
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G108C PUBLIC DEF OMBUDSMAN COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - OMBUDSMAN PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Defender Commission, to be payable from
the State Central Services Fund, for personal services of the Arkansas Public
Defender Commission - Ombudsman Program for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $58,972
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 21,519
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $80,491

SECTION 9. REGULAR SALARIES - COMMISSION FOR PARENT COUNSEL. There is
hereby established for the Arkansas Public Defender Commission - Commission
for Parent Counsel for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G296C EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR PARENT COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS15
(2) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS12
(3) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(4) G297C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT PARENT COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS06
(5) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(6) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 7

SECTION 10. EXTRA HELP - COMMISSION FOR PARENT COUNSEL. There is
hereby authorized, for the Arkansas Public Defender Commission - Commission
for Parent Counsel for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
04-14-2025 11:42:38 JAR033

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 S4/14/25 SB67
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: fourteen (14)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - COMMISSION FOR PARENT COUNSEL. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Defender Commission, to be
payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services,
operating expenses and parent counsel refunds/reimbursements of the
Commission for Parent Counsel for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $535,172
(02) EXTRA HELP 280,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 200,522
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 50,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 75,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) PARENT COUNSEL REIMBURSEMENTS 3,630,231
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,780,925

SECTION 12. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
INDIGENT PARENT COUNSEL REPRESENTATION. The Commission for Parent Counsel
shall have the authority to use the appropriation provided in line item
Parent Counsel Reimbursements of the Parent Counsel Program appropriation
herein for the purpose of entering into independent professional service
contracts on a full-time or part-time basis with attorneys who are qualified
to provide counsel for indigent parents in dependency-neglect cases.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
04-14-2025 11:42:38 JAR033

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 S4/14/25 SB67
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 13. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION – LINE ITEMS - COMMISSION FOR PARENT COUNSEL. After
receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and prior
review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, the
Director of the Arkansas Public Defender Commission is authorized to transfer
appropriation, with the exception of Personal Services Matching, between the
line items authorized herein for the Commission for Parent Counsel, to best
utilize resources to meet the needs of the Parent Counsel’s clientele.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 14. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
EXTRA HELP EXEMPTION - COMMISSION FOR PARENT COUNSEL. Extra Help positions
authorized herein for the Commission for Parent Counsel are specifically
exempt from limitation of hours. Employees currently working on a part-time
basis may be utilized concurrently as Extra Help within the agency. The
total amount of compensation for part-time and Extra Help work combined
cannot exceed the maximum compensation allowed for a grade GS11 as authorized
in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act. Flexibility is needed to
allow for non-traditional work schedules that may be necessary to accommodate
the schedule of the individual being represented. Attorneys utilized as
Extra Help employees are not prevented from having other employment.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 15. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION. If the Public Defender Commission should determine that
the appropriations made available for payments to the Counties are
insufficient, appropriation may be transferred from the Public Defender
Commission Program line item to the Bail Bond-County Public Defender line
item, after receiving approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
04-14-2025 11:42:38 JAR033

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 S4/14/25 SB67
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 16. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
PUBLIC DEFENDERS. (a) No funds appropriated herein shall be used for
expenses in cases where a defendant is represented by retained counsel where
retained counsel have not gone through the Public Defender Commission's
attorney certification procedure and designation process as established by
state law and the Commission's regulations. All defendants and retained
attorneys must strictly adhere to the procedure established by the Commission
to equitably and responsibly monitor and distribute State funds for this
purpose.
(b) The Public Defender Commission may approve exemptions to subsection
(a) as needed. Reasons for granting exemption should be specified in writing.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 17. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
MAXIMUM SALARY. In order to maintain equity between the prosecutors and
public defenders, the following classifications are authorized to be paid up
to the maximum salary of their grade as determined by the Public Defender
Commission after approval by the Office of Personnel Management:

1. Chief Public Defender G008N
2. Public Defender III G012N
3. Public Defender II G022N
4. Public Defender I G025N
5. Public Defender Attorney I G065C
6. Attorney Supervisor G025C
7. Attorney Specialist G047C

The Office of Personnel Management shall file a report of all salary changes
established pursuant to this section with the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, at the next
04-14-2025 11:42:38 JAR033

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 S4/14/25 SB67
regularly scheduled meeting following the approval.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024 2025
through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 18. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. EXTRA
HELP EXEMPTION. The Arkansas Public Defender Commission may utilize their
authorized extra help positions up to a maximum of one thousand eight hundred
(1,800) hours. The rates of pay may not exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification Act or its successor, for the appropriate classification.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 19. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 20. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 21. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
04-14-2025 11:42:38 JAR033

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 S4/14/25 SB67
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee



























04-14-2025 11:42:38 JAR033